src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                      Lule Sámi morphological analyser                      !
! ========================================================================== !


! ======================
!! !!!Sublexica for Noun
! ======================

!! !!Even-syllable stems
! -------------------

!! !2syll stems
! - - - - - -

LEXICON MUORRA !!= @CODE@ Standard even stems with cg (note Q1). OBS: Nouns with invisible 3>2 cg (as busºsa) go to this lexicon.
 +N:   MUORRAInfl ;
 +N:%> MUORRACmp  ;

!!€gt-norm:  # Even-syllable test
!!€ kártta:         kártta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ kártajn:        kártta+N+Sg+Com

LEXICON MUORRAInfl
 :%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
 :%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ; ! Weak grade Q1
 :»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 :»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
 :»    DenominalAdjsV2      ;

LEXICON NOADE !!= @CODE@ Even stem without cg. OBS: No nouns with invisible 3>2 cg (as busºsa) in this lexicon. OBS: Because of denominal nouns taking a weak grade stem, entries in grade 3 are given the gradation mark º in order to prevent alternation to weak grade. We should consider creating a separate denominal nouns lexicon for NOADE instead.
 +N:%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
 +N:%> N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
 +N:»    DenominalNounsNOADE  ;
 +N:»    DenominalAdjsV1_1      ;
 +N:»Y7  DenominalAdjsV2      ; 
 +N:%>   NOADECmp             ;

!!€gt-norm: låda # Even-syllable test
!!€ låda:                 låda+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ lådas:               låda+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON LINNJA !!= @CODE@ Only for the loan word "linnja". Because it's a loan word, the "nnj" is pronounced "nn-j", and therefore does not behave as the regular lule sami "nj" sound and therefore it doesn't follow the rule that makes a:á in 1. grade with short vowel in first syllable (It isn't as linnja-linjáv or birás-birrasav). This word is therefore sub taged. Norwegian/Swedish words with a short "i" followed by two different consonants are assimilated to lule sami in different manners accoring to the consonants in question, but the word is always on grade III (Morén-Duolljá 2014). The correctly assimilated form linºnja is added to NOADE lexicon in stems file.
            +N+OLang/NOB:nnja%> N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
            +N+OLang/NOB:nja%>  N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ; ! Weak grade Q1
            +N+OLang/NOB:nja»   DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
            +N+OLang/NOB:nja»   DenominalAdjsV1      ;
!                     +N:nja»   DenominalAdjsV2      ;
  +N+OLang/NOB+Cmp/SgNom:nnja%> R                    ;
  +N+OLang/NOB+Cmp/SgGen:nja%>  R                    ;
  +N+OLang/NOB+Cmp/PlGen:nja%>j R                    ;

!!€gt-norm: linja # Even-syllable test
!!€ linnja:                linnja+N+Sg+Nom
! !!€ linjajn               linnja+N+Sg+Com
! !!€ linjav                linnja+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON SÁMEGIEL !!= @CODE@ Compounds on -giella, with short -giel as middle compound (sámegielåhpadiddje)
!      +N+Attr:      K          ;
            +N:la    MUORRAInfl ;
     +N+Cmp/Sh:%>    Rreal      ;
              :ag9   DER-AGAdj  ;
! +N+Cmp/SgGen:%>Q1  Rreal      ;
! +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>Q1j Rreal      ;

!!€gt-norm: rievsakgiella # Even-syllable test
!!€ rievsakgiella:               rievsakgiella+N+Sg+Nom
! !!€ rievsakgiel               rievsakgiella+N+Attr

LEXICON AHKA !!= @CODE@ Words like tjerastahka, with short compound form
                   +N:ahka%>    N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
                   +N:ahka%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ; ! Weak grade Q1
                   +N:ahka»     DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
                   +N:ahka»     DenominalAdjsV1      ;
!                  +N:ahka»     DenominalAdjsV2      ;
!+N+Der4+Der/ahtes:» AHTES ; Only for odd-syllble stems
     +N+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:ak%>      K                    ;
         +N+Cmp/SgNom:ahka%>    R                    ;
  +N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Sh:ak%>      R                    ;
         +N+Cmp/SgGen:ahka%>Q1  R                    ;
         +N+Cmp/PlGen:ahka%>Q1j R                    ;

!!€gt-norm: báládahka # Even-syllable test
!!€ báládahka:               báládahka+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ báládak:               báládahka+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ báládagáv:               báládahka+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON DARRHA !!= @CODE@ Only for "darrha" or compounds that end on "darrha".
           +N:rha%> N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
           +N:há%>  N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ; ! Weak grade Q1
           +N:há»   DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
           +N:há»   DenominalAdjsV1      ;
! +N:há» DenominalAdjsV2 ; not plausible
 +N+Cmp/SgNom:rha%> R                    ;
 +N+Cmp/SgGen:há%>  R                    ;
 +N+Cmp/PlGen:há%>j R                    ;

!!€gt-norm: báktedarrha # Even-syllable test
!!€ báktedarrha:               báktedarrha+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ báktedarháv:               báktedarrha+N+Sg+Acc




!! !Nouns with comparatives
! - - - - - -

LEXICON GÁDDE !!= @CODE@ 2 syllable stems with cg (note Q1) with comparatives
                                        +N:%>          N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
                                        +N:%>Q1        N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ; ! Weak grade Q1
                                        +N:»           DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
                                        +N:»           DenominalAdjsV1      ;
                                        +N:»           DenominalAdjsV2      ;
                                        +N:%>          MUORRACmp            ;
                             +N+Der1+Der/A+A+Comp:%>Q1        BUStem               ;
                           +N+Der1+Der/A+A+Superl:%>Q1muss    BUOREMUS             ;
       +N+Der1+Der/A+A+Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom:»Q1busj%>   K                    ;
      +N+Der1+Der/A+A+Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+Sg+Attr:»Q1busj%>   ATTR                 ;
              +N+Der1+Der/A+A+Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:»Q1buttja%> GÅNÅGIS-EVEN         ;
+Err/Lex+Use/-Spell+N+Der1+Der/A+A+Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:»Q1budtja%> GÅNÅGIS-EVEN         ; !Gives gáttebudtjan and gáttebudtjaj barely not in use


!!€gt-norm: boassjo # Even-syllable test
!!€ boassjo:               boassjo+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ båssjujn:               boassjo+N+Sg+Com
!!€ boassjojn:               boassjo+N+Sg+Com
!!€ boassjop:               boassjo+N+Der/A+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
