src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
adræssalinnja+Err/Orth+Sem/Plc:a^dræ9ssa#li LINNJA ;
alvva+Sem/Feat:alvva MUORRA ;
anársámegiella+Err/Orth+Sem/Lang:ánár#giel SÁMEGIEL ; ! 
anársámegiella+Sem/Lang:anár#sáme#giel SÁMEGIEL ; ! 
badojbiddjá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:badoj#biddjá NOADE ;
bajádahka+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:bajád AHKA ;
berajgiella+Sem/Lang:beraj#giel SÁMEGIEL ; ! 
biednagoahte+Sem/Plc:biedna#goahte MUORRA ;
bierjjedahka+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Sem/Time:bierjjed AHKA ; ! 
bihtámsámegiella+Sem/Lang:bihtám#sáme#giel SÁMEGIEL ; ! 
birsso+Sem/Wpn:birsso NOADE ; ! 
boassjo+Sem/Plc:boasºsjo GÁDDE ; ! 
buojddudahka+Sem/State:buojddud AHKA ;
báhkotjoahkke+Sem/Dummytag:báhko#tjoahkke NOADE ;
báhtsaktsihtse+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:báhtsak#tsihtse MUORRA ;
báktedarrha+Sem/Dummytag:bákte#dar DARRHA ;
báktálahka+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:báktál AHKA ;
bávtásjdarrha+Sem/Dummytag:bávtásj#dar DARRHA ;
darrha+Sem/Dummytag:dar DARRHA ;
dartjádahka+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Wthr:dartjád AHKA ;
davvisámegiella+Sem/Lang:davvi#sáme#giel SÁMEGIEL ;
dulvve+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Time_Wthr:dulvve GÁDDE ; ! 
duoppto+Sem/Part:duoppto MUORRA ;
duorastahka+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Sem/Time:duorast AHKA ; ! 
dáfo+v1+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:dáfo NOADE ; ! 
dálvve+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Time:dálvve GÁDDE ; ! 
dárogiella+Sem/Lang:dáro#giel SÁMEGIEL ; ! 
fibromijalgiddja+Sem/Domain:fibromijalgiddja NOADE ; ! LOAN
fáhkagiella+Sem/Lang:fáhka#giel SÁMEGIEL ; ! 
galssjagidá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Wthr:galssja#gidá NOADE ;
gasska+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Feat-measr_Plc:gasska GÁDDE ; ! 
gasskamuddo+Sem/Plc_Time:gasska#muddo MUORRA ; ! 
gasskolinnja+Err/Orth+Sem/Plc-line:gassko#li LINNJA ;
getsadahka+Sem/Body:getsad AHKA ;
gierggebuodo+Sem/Obj:giergge#buodo NOADE ;
gullo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+Sem/Body-abstr:gullo MUORRA ; ! 
guojnagiella+Sem/Lang:guojna#giel SÁMEGIEL ; ! 
guottádahka+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Obj:guottád AHKA ;
gussjká+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:gussjká NOADE ;
gádde+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:gádde GÁDDE ;
gånndå+Sem/Dummytag:gånndå MUORRA ;
gæhpádahka+Sem/Dummytag:gæhpád AHKA ;
hebreagiella+Sem/Lang:hebrea#giel SÁMEGIEL ; ! 
hárddo+Sem/Body:hárddo NOADE ; ! 
iellemdásse+Sem/State:iellem#dásse MUORRA ;
ieŋŋilsgiella+Err/Orth+Sem/Lang:ieŋŋis#giel SÁMEGIEL ; ! 
julevusámegiella+Sem/Lang:julevu#sáme#giel SÁMEGIEL ;
juolggevuodo+Sem/Body:juolgge#vuodo NOADE ;
jáhkkudahka+Sem/Dummytag:jáhkkud AHKA ;
kloahkka+v1+Sem/Obj-el:kloahkka MUORRA ; ! 
linnja+Err/Orth+Sem/Edu_Geom_Plc-line:li LINNJA ; ! 
luoda+Sem/Dummytag:luoda NOADE ;
lådjudahka+Sem/Dummytag:lådjud AHKA ;
lånåstusbarggo+Sem/Act:lånåstus#barggo MUORRA ;
mafijá+Sem/Hum:mafijá NOADE ; ! LOAN
mieda+Sem/Food:mieda NOADE ; ! 
mánájbláde+Sem/Txt:mánáj#bláde NOADE ;
mánájgiella+Sem/Lang:mánáj#giel SÁMEGIEL ;
máttabádne+Sem/Body:mátta#bádne MUORRA ;
mållalinnja+Err/Orth+Sem/Plc-line:målla#li LINNJA ;
mægástahka+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:mægást AHKA ;
návsste+Sem/Build:návsste NOADE ; ! 
nåjdudahka+Sem/Dummytag:nåjdud AHKA ;
oajvve+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Body_Plc-elevate:oajvve GÁDDE ; ! 
oajvvesuorgge+Sem/Plc-abstr_Rule:oajvve#suorgge MUORRA ;
oarjjelsámegiella+Sem/Lang:oarjjel#sáme#giel SÁMEGIEL ; ! 
piánoj+Err/Orth+Sem/Tool-music:pi^ánu NOADE ; ! LOAN 
rabdda+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Sem/Obj:rabdda GÁDDE ; ! 
rabddalinnja+Err/Orth+Sem/Plc-line:rabdda#li LINNJA ;
romagiella+Sem/Lang:roma#giel SÁMEGIEL ;
ruovddehárppo+Sem/Tool:ruovdde#hárppo MUORRA ;
rájdde+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:rájdde NOADE ; ! 
råkkådahka+Sem/Dummytag:råkkåd AHKA ;
sijddagiella+Sem/Lang:sijdda#giel SÁMEGIEL ;
sisvuodna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sis#vuodna MUORRA ;
skielbbidahka+Sem/Dummytag:skielbbid AHKA ;
skoade+Sem/Dummytag:skoade NOADE ;
skæŋŋga+Sem/Dummytag:skæŋŋga MUORRA ;
sujtto+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Act_Domain:sujtto MUORRA ;
suodnagæsádahka+Sem/State-sick:suodna#gæsád AHKA ;
svierigadárogiella+Sem/Lang:svieriga#dáro#giel SÁMEGIEL ; ! 
sámedikkeráde+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Org:sáme#dikke#ráde NOADE ; ! 
tjaktja+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Time:tjaktja GÁDDE ; ! 
tjalánbádne+Sem/Dummytag:tjalán#bádne MUORRA ;
tjoakkáldahka+Sem/Dummytag:tjoakkáld AHKA ;
tsirikoajvve+Sem/Body:tsirik#oajvve GÁDDE ;
tsuobbutjivgga+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:tsuobbu#tjivgga MUORRA ;
tsáskádahka+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:tsáskád AHKA ;
unneplågogiella+Sem/Lang:unnep#lågo#giel SÁMEGIEL ; ! 
vahkkobláde+Err/Orth+Sem/Txt:vahkko#blade NOADE ;
vuodosuomagiella+Sem/Lang:vuodo#suoma#giel SÁMEGIEL ;
vuohtarájppe+Sem/Dummytag:vuohta#rájppe MUORRA ;
vuojadahka+Sem/Dummytag:vuojad AHKA ;
vájmogiella+Sem/Lang:vájmo#giel SÁMEGIEL ;
ájnádahka+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Wthr:ájnád AHKA ;
ájtteklánnda+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:ájttek#lánnda MUORRA ; ! 
álmmukgirkko+Sem/Org:álmmuk#girkko NOADE ;
ådåvuonadárogiella+Sem/Lang:ådå#vuona#dáro#giel SÁMEGIEL ;
